Utah statutes.
58-80a-503.   Unprofessional conduct.

"Unprofessional conduct" includes:

(1)  conduct which is detrimental to the interests of the public;

(2)  willful or negligent betrayal or disclosure of confidential information about which the certified medical language interpreter becomes knowledgeable as a result of or incidental to the certified medical language interpreter's practice as a certified medical language interpreter;

(3)  false or deceptive representation of a certified medical language interpreter's skills, competence, capability, or resources as a certified medical language interpreter;

(4)  offering, undertaking, or agreeing to undertake an assignment as a certified medical language interpreter for which the certified medical language interpreter is not qualified or which the certified medical language interpreter cannot complete as agreed in a professional manner;

(5)  the use of any chemical, drug, or alcohol in any unlawful manner or in any manner which negatively affects the ability of the certified medical language interpreter to competently practice as a certified medical language interpreter;

(6)  willfully and intentionally making any false or fraudulent interpretation, statement, or representation in the performance of the certified medical language interpreter's duties;

(7)  any conduct contrary to the recognized standards and ethics of the profession of a certified medical language interpreter;

(8)  gross incompetence in practice as a certified medical language interpreter;

(9)  violation of any provision of this chapter or rules promulgated to regulate the practice of certified medical language interpreters; or

(10)  conviction of a felony or any other crime which is considered by the division to represent activity detrimental to the public interest as that interest is reflected in the person continuing to practice as a certified medical language interpreter.



Enacted by Chapter 127, 2010 General Session

